Utah, session 2026, HB538.
Section 1. Section 36-3-201 is repealed and reenacted to read:36-3-201. Beginning date of annual budget and general sessions.(1)The annual budget session of the Legislature shall begin the fourth Monday in February.(2)The first annual general session of the Legislature shall begin the first Monday in May.(3)The second annual general session of the Legislature shall begin the second Monday in September.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect January 1, 2028, if the amendment to the Utah Constitution proposed by H.J.R. 22, Proposal to Amend Utah Constitution - Legislative Session, 2026 General Session, passes the Legislature and is approved by a majority of those voting on it at the next regular general election.